Utah statutes.
78B-5-305.   Lien.

(1)  A foreign judgment entered in a district court under this part becomes a lien as provided in Section 78B-5-202 if:

(a)  a stay of execution has not been granted;

(b)  the requirements of this chapter are satisfied; and

(c)  the judgment is recorded in the office of the county recorder where the property of the judgment debtor is located, as provided in Section 78B-5-202.

(2)  The lien becomes effective at the time and date of recording and expires eight years after date of entry by the court in the foreign jurisdiction unless renewed in Utah as required by Utah law.

